Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 235 Boats and Boating
235.220.
Manufacturer’s and dealer’s registration — Suspension or revocation of license.

Every manufacturer of or dealer in motorboats in this state shall register with the cabinet at Frankfort, Kentucky, and pay an annual registration fee as set by the department by administrative regulation. Upon receipt of this fee, the department shall issue to the manufacturer or dealer a certificate of number and a plate bearing the number assigned, which plate shall be so designed that it can be transferred from boat to boat. Every manufacturer or dealer registered under this section shall be furnished additional dealer certificates of number and plates upon the payment of two dollars ($2) for each additional certificate of number desired. A motorboat bearing dealer’s plates and carrying a dealer’s certificate of number may be used only by a member of the firm registered or by a bona fide salesman or employee of the firm for any purpose reasonably connected with the sale or demonstration for sale and delivery of the dealer’s motorboat or by any manufacturer or dealer, licensed as provided above, in transporting any motorboat over the waters of this state to his place of retail business for the manufacturer or wholesale dealer in motorboats and for no other purpose.

Every motorboat dealer or manufacturer who acquires a used motorboat for cash, trade-in, or in any other manner, shall within fifteen (15) days from date of acquisition have the registration assigned to himself. The dealer shall execute his application for assignment upon documents designated by the cabinet to the county clerk of the county in which he maintains his principal place of business and pay the transfer fee. The clerk shall enter the assignment upon the automated system.

The dealer shall retain the properly assigned certificate of title received from his transferor and may make any reassignments thereon until the forms for dealer assignment on the certificate of title are exhausted. The cabinet may, if it deems warranted, provide a special document to allow for additional dealer assignments without requiring system generated documents.

If the dealer assigns the motorboat to a purchaser for use, he shall deliver the properly assigned certificate of title to the purchaser, who shall make application for registration and a certificate of title thereon, pursuant to KRS

235.050

.

The cabinet shall insure that the automated system is capable of accepting instructions from the county clerk that a certificate of title shall not be produced under a dealer registration situation.

The license of any dealer or manufacturer may be suspended or revoked by the cabinet for a violation of any section of this statute. Such persons shall be afforded a full opportunity to defend themselves against any charges at a hearing set by this department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 24; 1974, ch. 292, § 23; 1980, ch. 295, § 82, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 446, § 8, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 163, § 13, effective January 1, 1990; 1998, ch. 275, § 8, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A sale by the operator of a filling station or of a used car lot of his own motorboat would not make such a person a dealer within the meaning of the statute.

OAG 64-590

.

The sale of used motorboats by filling stations and used car lots makes the operators thereof dealers in motorboats and subject to the registration requirements of the statute.

OAG 64-590

.

235.230.
Duties of boat marina owner.

The owner of a boat marina shall keep a record of the name and address of the person or persons hiring any vessel which is designed or permitted by him to be operated as a motorboat; the identification number thereof; and the departure time and date, and the expected time of return. The record shall be preserved for at least six (6) months.

Neither the owner of a boat marina, nor his agent or employee shall permit any motorboat or any vessel owned or leased by him to be operated as a motorboat to depart from his premises unless it has been provided, either by the owner or the renter, with the equipment required pursuant to KRS

235.200

and any rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, except that the operator need not have the certificate of registration in his possession.

The certificate of registration and number for vessels leased or rented by a marina may be retained on shore by the owner of the marina or his representative at the place from which the vessel departs or returns to the possession of the livery or his representative; provided, however, the operator shall have with him a copy of the lease or rental agreement signed by the marina owner or an authorized representative of the marina and by the person leasing or renting the vessel that contains the vessel’s number which appears on the certificate of number and the period of time for which the vessel is leased or rented.

By July 15, 2000, the owner of a marina shall provide access to sewage pumpout facilities for the owners of motorboats with marine toilet facilities. For the purpose of this subsection a sewage pumpout facility means equipment designed to receive the discharge of sewage from a marine sanitation device and allow the disposal of the sewage in a manner that prevents the sewage from entering the waters of the state. To provide access to sewage pumpout facilities a marina owner may, by way of illustration and not to limit the options available to a marina owner:

Build and operate pumpout facilities;

Contract with another marina owner with pumpout facilities, if the contracting marinas are not more than eight (8) water miles apart and accessible in a way that does not require motorboats to be trailered; and

Contract with a person licensed under KRS

211.972

to provide pumpout facility service, if the service is available during normal business hours including holidays and if the service can be provided within a reasonable time upon request by a motorboat owner.

For any period of contracted mooring at a marina longer than twenty-four (24) hours, the owner of a boat shall provide to the marina owner or his or her agent or employee the title, or equivalent document, for the boat. The owner of the marina or his or her agent or employee shall retain the title or a copy of the title in the marina’s records for the period of time, beyond twenty-four (24) hours, for which the marina is contracted to provide mooring to the boat.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 25; 1978, ch. 263, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 71, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 2016 ch. 120, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

235.240.
Prohibition of operation of boat negligently or while intoxicated or drugged — Consent to test for alcohol or drugs — Elements of operation under influence of alcohol or other substance.

A person shall not operate any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any water skis, surfboard, or similar device, in a reckless or negligent manner so as to endanger the life or property of any person.

A person shall not operate any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any water skis, surfboard, or similar device, while intoxicated or under the influence of any other substance which impairs one’s driving ability.

Any person who operates a vessel upon the waters of the Commonwealth shall be deemed to have given consent to a test or tests as accepted by the state’s evidentiary mandate for the purpose of determining the operator’s alcohol concentration or the presence of other drugs. The test or tests shall be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer who has probable cause to believe that the operator may have been violating this section.

For the purposes of enforcing subsection (2) of this section, the elements of the offense are those established in KRS 189A.010(1) to (4), except that the penalties for this offense are set forth in KRS

235.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 26; 1998, ch. 22, § 3, effective March 3, 1998; 2000, ch. 467, § 22, effective October 1, 2000; 2019 ch. 171, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Kentucky Instructions to Juries (Civil), 5th Ed., Watercraft, § 26.01.

235.250.
Duties of operator or owner in case of accident.

It shall be the duty of the operator of a vessel involved in a collision, accident, or other casualty, so far as he can do so without serious danger to his own vessel, crew, and passengers (if any), to render to other persons affected by the collision, accident, or other casualty such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in order to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the collision, accident, or other casualty, and also to give his name, address, and identification of his vessel in writing to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, accident, or other casualty.

In the case of collision, accident, or other casualty involving a vessel, the operator thereof, if the collision, accident, or other casualty results in death or injury to a person or damage to property in excess of five hundred dollars ($500), shall file with the department a full description of the collision, accident, or other casualty, including such information as said agency may by regulation require. When the operator of a vessel, who is not the owner of it, cannot submit the casualty or accident report required by subsection (1) of this section, the owner shall submit the casualty or accident report.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 27; 1974, ch. 292, § 18; 1978, ch. 263, § 17, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 446, § 4, effective April 12, 1982; 1998, ch. 23, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 243, § 1, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, Negligence — Violation of Safety Regulation as Negligence per se: The Perishable Sanction, 62 Ky. L.J. 254 (1973-1974).

235.260.
Status of accident reports.

All required accident reports and supplemental reports shall be without prejudice to the individual making them and shall be for the confidential use of the department, except that the department may disclose the identity of a person involved in an accident when his identity is not otherwise known or when he denies his presence at an accident. No such report shall be used in evidence in any trial arising out of an accident, but the department shall furnish upon demand of any person who has or claims to have made such a report or, upon demand of any court, a certificate showing that a specified accident report has or has not been made to the department, solely in order to prove compliance or noncompliance with the requirements of KRS

235.250

that such a report be made.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 28; 1978, ch. 384, § 97, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 446, § 5, effective April 12, 1982; 1998, ch. 23, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

235.270.
Giving information to federal government — Agreements with qualified parties to accept inspections of marine sanitation devices.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the department pursuant to KRS

235.250

shall be transmitted to said official or agency of the United States.

The commissioner shall enter into an agreement with the United States Coast Guard to accept Coast Guard inspections of vessels for the purpose of determining if the vessel’s marine sanitation device is the proper kind for the water body where the vessel is kept or operated and that it is properly operating. The commissioner may enter into agreements with any other professional or qualified group, organization, or individual to accept certified inspections of vessels for the purpose of determining if the vessel’s marine sanitation device is the proper kind for the water body where the vessel is kept or operated and that it is properly operating.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 29; 1974, ch. 292, § 19; 1998, ch. 23, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 71, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 23 and 71 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

235.280.
Regulation of use of waters.

The commissioner of the department, with approval of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Commission, shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to govern the fair, reasonable, equitable, and safe use of all waters of this state and otherwise to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 30; 1962, ch. 291; 1974, ch. 292, § 20; 1980, ch. 295, § 80, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 446, § 6, effective April 12, 1982; 1994, ch. 118, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 23, § 9, effective July 15, 1998.

235.285.
Personal watercraft — Use for towing — Prohibitions on use without personal flotation device or self-circling capability — General prohibitions of vessel operation — Exceptions — Supervision of minors.

A personal watercraft may be used to tow individuals engaged in waterskiing or similar activities if it has adequate seating capacity and an observer on board to monitor the progress of the person being towed, or if it is equipped with a rearview mirror with a minimum field of vision of one hundred sixty (160) degrees mounted so that the operator can observe the activities of the person being towed.

A person shall not operate a personal watercraft on public waters unless every individual operating or riding on the personal watercraft is wearing a personal flotation device that is approved by the United States Coast Guard under 46 C.F.R. sec. 160, as it may be amended or renumbered.

A personal watercraft that does not have self-circling capability shall not be operated on public waters unless:

The personal watercraft is equipped with a lanyard-type engine cutoff switch; and

The lanyard is attached to the person, clothing, or personal flotation device of the operator.

A vessel operated on public waters shall be operated at all times according to the provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations promulgated hereunder. A vessel shall be operated at all times in a reasonable and prudent manner so as not to endanger human life, human physical safety, or property. A person shall not do any of the following while operating a vessel on public waters:

Weave through congested watercraft traffic in a way that endangers human life, human physical safety, or property;

Follow a watercraft that is towing an individual on water skis, a surfboard, or a water sport device in a way that endangers human life, human physical safety, or property;

Jump the wake of another watercraft in a way that endangers human life, human physical safety, or property;

Cut between a boat and the individual or individuals being towed by the boat;

Cross paths with another watercraft when visibility around the other watercraft is so obstructed as to endanger human life, human physical safety, or property; or

Steer a personal watercraft or motorboat toward an object or individual in the water and turn sharply at close range in a way that endangers human life, human physical safety, or property.

A person shall not operate a personal watercraft on public waters at any time between sunset and the following sunrise.

A person shall not operate a vessel within fifty (50) feet of a commercial motor vessel and its tow which is in operation on a waterway, except if the operator of the commercial motor vessel has given his or her consent.

A person under twelve (12) years of age shall not operate a personal watercraft or motorboat over ten (10) horsepower on the public waters of the Commonwealth.

Effective January 1, 1999, a person twelve (12) years of age through seventeen (17) years of age shall not operate a personal watercraft or motorboat over ten (10) horsepower on the public waters of the Commonwealth unless the person is in possession of a safe boating certificate or is accompanied, on board, by a person eighteen (18) years of age or older or in possession of a safe boating certificate.

While operating a motorboat or a personal watercraft over ten (10) horsepower on the public waters of the Commonwealth, nonresidents twelve (12) years of age through seventeen (17) years of age shall have in their possession a Kentucky safe boating certificate or a recognized and equivalent boat operator licensing or safe boating certificate from another state or country.

Subsections (1) to (6) of this section shall not apply to:

A performer engaged in a professional exhibition; or

A person participating in a regatta, a race, a marine parade, a tournament, or an exhibit that is held in compliance with administrative regulations adopted by the department.

The parent, legal guardian, or other adult who has direct supervision over a minor under the age of eighteen (18) shall not knowingly authorize or permit the minor to operate a motorboat or personal watercraft in violation of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 22, § 2, effective March 3, 1998; 2012, ch. 6, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 109, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 4 provided that that Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Boater Freedom Act.” This statute was amended in Section 2 of that Act.

235.287.
Prohibition areas on lake waters at drinking water intakes — Exemption.

If a water supply system requests and receives authorization from the Division of Water to designate a prohibition area, no vessel on lake waters of this state shall moor or anchor within one hundred (100) feet of a drinking water intake unless an extension of the area of prohibition is requested and granted under subsection (3) of this section.

The Division of Water shall identify areas on lake waters of this state where a drinking water intake is located. The division shall authorize a water supply system to designate a prohibition area if circumstances are demonstrated justifying the designation. The water supply system shall be responsible for posting signs visible to persons operating vessels indicating areas containing a drinking water intake.

The division shall allow water supply systems with intakes on lake waters of this state to request that the prohibition on mooring or anchoring be extended beyond one hundred (100) feet but no farther than three hundred (300) feet. The division may grant a request if the water supply system demonstrates circumstances that justify extending the area of prohibition. The division shall inform the Department for Fish and Wildlife Resources when an area of prohibition is designated or a request to extend an area of prohibition is granted.

Private or commercial docks shall be exempt from the provisions of subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 413, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

235.290.
Regulation of boat races and similar activities.

The department may authorize the holding of regattas, motorboat or other boat races, marine parades, tournaments, or exhibitions involving more than one hundred (100) boats on any waters of this state. It shall adopt and may, from time to time, amend regulations concerning the safety of motorboats and other vessels and persons thereon, either observers or participants. When a regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition involving more than one hundred (100) boats is proposed to be held, the person in charge thereof shall, at least fifteen (15) days prior thereto, file an application with the department for permission to hold the regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition. The application shall set forth the date, time, and location where it is proposed to hold the regatta, motorboat or other boat race, marine parade, tournament, or exhibition, and it shall not be conducted without authorization of the department in writing.

The provisions of this section shall not exempt any person from compliance with applicable federal law or regulation, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to require the securing of a state permit pursuant to this section if a permit therefor has been obtained from an authorized agency of the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 31; 1974, ch. 292, § 21; 1990, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 23, § 10, effective July 15, 1998.

235.300.
Civil liability for negligent operation.

The operator of a vessel or motorboat shall be liable for any injury or damage occasioned by the negligent operation of such vessel or motorboat, whether such negligence consists of a violation of the provisions of the statutes of this state or neglecting to observe such ordinary care and operation as the rules of the common law require. Where the owner is not the operator of the vessel or motorboat he shall not be liable for such injury or damage unless such owner is aboard the vessel or motorboat at the time of such injury or damage or unless the operator at such time of injury or damage is operating said boat upon the owner’s business or in the course and scope of his employment with the owner. The “Family Purpose Doctrine” as it is applied in the use and operation of automobiles shall be applicable to the use and operation of vessels or motorboats. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to relieve any other person from any liability which he would otherwise have, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to authorize or permit any recovery in excess of injury or damage actually incurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 32.

235.310.
Enforcement — Powers and status of division employees — Use of radio communication equipment.

The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall designate officers and employees of the department to enforce the provisions of this chapter, and these officers when duly authorized by the commissioner shall have the general powers of a peace officer for the enforcement of other offenses against the Commonwealth. In enforcing the provisions of this chapter, these officers and all other peace officers of the Commonwealth and its subdivisions shall have the right to enter upon all waters of this state, either private or public, for the purpose of inspecting certificate of registration and boat numbering, but shall only have the right to stop or enter upon boats on such waters if the officer has a reasonable and articulable suspicion based upon specific and articulable facts which, taken together with rational inferences from those facts, demonstrate that a violation of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or an administrative regulation promulgated under this chapter has occurred, with any subsequent search of the boat or persons on it being authorized only if supported by probable cause. The provisions of this section shall not apply to license inspections under KRS 150.090(5), but only as to those licenses and items specified in that section. They may arrest on sight, without warrant, any person detected by them in the act of violating any of the provisions of this chapter. They shall have the same rights as sheriffs to require aid in arresting, with or without process, any person found by them violating any of the provisions of this chapter or other offenses against the Commonwealth.

The officers designated in subsection (1) of this section shall be authorized to possess and use radio communication equipment capable of receiving and transmitting on state police radio frequency. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall cooperate with the department for the purpose of radio communication of these officers when any assistance is necessary.

The department may conduct periodic inspections of marine sanitation devices according to a regular inspection schedule to be determined by the department. To conduct the marine sanitation device inspection, the department officers and employees may require a motorboat owner to flush a dye through the marine toilet in the presence of the department officers or employees or use other appropriate measures to inspect the device.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 33; 1972, ch. 220, § 1; 1974, ch. 292, § 22; 1980, ch. 295, § 81, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 446, § 7, effective April 12, 1982; 1994, ch. 118, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 23, § 11, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 71, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 85, § 263, effective June 26, 2007; 2014, ch. 109, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 4 provided that that Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Boater Freedom Act.” This statute was amended in Section 1 of that Act.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The police department of Frankfort would have the right to enforce not only the provisions of the boating act but also the criminal laws of the Commonwealth on the Kentucky River that lies within the boundaries of the city; however, such jurisdiction would not be exclusive but coextensive with the jurisdiction provided in this section.

OAG 72-596

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Peace officers, defined, KRS

61.310

,

446.010

.

Seizure and sale of contraband, KRS

150.120

.

235.312.
Annual report on law enforcement officer training and changes in law enforcement practices and interactions with public.

On or before October 31 of each year, the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission, for referral to the appropriate interim joint committee, detailing the continued training measures that the department has undertaken during the past year for law enforcement officers in the areas of enforcement policy and professionalism training to enhance the public’s experience in interacting with the department’s officers and in enjoying outdoor activities while maintaining a safe and lawful environment. The report shall also include any changes that the department implemented during the past year regarding its law enforcement practices and interactions with the public.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 109, § 3, effective July 15, 2014.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 109, sec. 4 provided that that Act shall be known and may be cited as the “Boater Freedom Act.” This statute was amended in Section 3 of that Act.

235.315.
Citation for violation committed in presence of officer.

If the violation of any section of this chapter or regulation promulgated thereunder is committed in the presence of the officer, the officer may, in lieu of making a physical arrest, issue a citation requiring the defendant to appear before the District Court of the county in which the offense occurred at a future time to be stated in the citation. In no event shall the citation state a time of appearance in excess of ten (10) days from the date the citation was issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 172, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 218, effective January 2, 1978.

235.320.
Director’s power to make regulations. [Repealed.]

235.330.
Moneys collected to be credited to the fish and game fund and not to be commingled.

All moneys collected under the provisions of KRS

235.080

,

235.130

, and

235.220

, except that specified for distribution to the county clerks or Transportation Cabinet, shall be paid into the State Treasury in the manner prescribed by law and credited to a special fund known as the fish and game fund under separate restricted fund account not commingled with funds received under KRS Chapter 150 and maintained according to generally accepted accounting principles.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, §§ 37, 38; 1974, ch. 292, § 24; 1982, ch. 446, § 9, effective April 12, 1982; 1990, ch. 391, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 23, § 12, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 275, § 9, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 158, § 8, effective July 15, 2010.